Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB472.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 206 introductory paragraph, 207.1(f) and 213 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, are amended to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 206. Department Heads.--[Each] Except as provided in section 213 of this act, each administrative department shall have as its head an officer who shall, either personally, by deputy, or by the duly authorized agent or employe of the department, and subject at all times to the provisions of this act, exercise the powers and perform the duties by law vested in and imposed upon the department.* * *Section 207.1. Gubernatorial Appointments.--* * *(f) A person, other than one serving until a successor is appointed and qualified, nominated by the Governor to a position for which Senate confirmation is required by this section shall not serve in such position nor receive any compensation for serving in such position until he has been confirmed by action of the Senate or by its inaction as provided by the Constitution of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and his appointment or commission thereafter issued by the Governor: Provided, however, That nothing contained in this section shall be construed to repeal or modify section 213 of this act: And provided further, That, subject to section 213 of this act, nothing in this act shall affect the right of an incumbent, whose term of office has expired, to continue in his office until his successor is appointed and qualified.* * *Section 213. Deputies.--The Governor shall appoint and fix the compensation of such number of deputy heads of administrative departments, except those of the Department of Auditor General and Treasury Department, as the Executive Board shall approve, who shall, in the absence of the head of such department, have the right to exercise all the powers and 20250SB0472PN0427 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 perform all the duties by law vested in and imposed upon the head of such department, except the power to appoint bureau or division chiefs, or other assistants or employes, and who may, at any time, exercise such of the powers and perform such of the duties of the head of his department as may be prescribed by the head of his department: Provided, however, That any such deputy shall not have the right to exercise any power or perform any duty which the Constitution of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania requires the head of his department personally to exercise or perform.Whenever there shall be a vacancy in the office of the head of any department, such deputy as the Governor shall designate in writing shall exercise the powers and perform the duties of the head of the department until the vacancy is filled[.], as follows:(1) No designation shall be effective for greater than ninety (90) days unless the individual is nominated for a position under section 207.1(d)(1), in which case the designation shall be effective until the Senate acts on the nomination under section 8(b) of Article IV of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(2) During the period of designation, the deputy shall have the title "Deputy - Head of Department."(3) No deputy may continue as "Deputy - Head of Department" after the expiration of the period in paragraph (1).(4) No individual may be designated as deputy more than once by the same Governor.(5) No designated deputy may receive salary, compensation or emoluments which exceeds the highest salary, compensation or emoluments received by a nondesignated deputy.20250SB0472PN0427 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) No designated deputy shall receive any increase in salary, compensation or emoluments during the period of designation or as a result of designation.(7) A designated deputy shall, upon request of either the Appropriations Committee of the Senate or the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, appear at a hearing of either committee concerning the Federal or State appropriations to the department or the budget request of the department.In addition to a designated deputy under paragraph (7), a person nominated by the Governor to a position as the head of any department shall, during the period which the nomination is under consideration by the Senate under section 8(b) of Article IV of the Constitution of Pennsylvania, upon request of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate or the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives, appear at a hearing of either committee concerning the Federal or State appropriations to the department or the budget request of the department.With the approval of the Governor in writing, the head of any department may authorize a named deputy to serve in his stead on any board or commission, except the Board of Pardons of which such department head is a member ex-officio. One of the Deputy Adjutants General shall possess the same qualifications in all respects as are required by law for the Adjutant General of the Department of Military Affairs.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0472PN0427 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627